New York, session 2025-2026, A6105.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 170-i 2 to read as follows: 3 § 170-i. Paper copies of required forms to be provided. Any state 4 agency that requires the filing of a form or forms by a resident indi- 5 vidual or by a commercial entity located within the state shall mail 6 such individual or commercial entity a paper copy of such form or forms. 7 Individuals and commercial entities may file such form or forms by mail 8 or in person and shall not be required to submit any form or forms elec- 9 tronically. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 11 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08704-01-5